src/case.regex
a (->) A, b (->) B, v (->) V, g (->) G, d (->) D, e (->) E, ë (->) Ë, 
ð (->) Ð, ð¤ (->) Ð¤, £ (->) ¥, z (->) Z, z¤ (->) Z¤, 
i (->) I, ï (->) Ï, j (->) J, k (->) K, l (->) L, m (->) M, n (->) N,
o (->) O, ö (->) Ö, p (->) P, r (->) R, s (->) S, t (->) T, u (->) U,
f (->) F, h (->) H, c (->) C, þ (->) Þ, § (->) ß, §¤ (->) ß¤, y (->) Y,
ê (->) Ê, û (->) Û, â (->) Â || .#. _ ;
